Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB346.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.050 is amended to read as follows:
The members of the Council on Postsecondary Education shall receive one hundred
dollars ($100) per day for each council meeting attended and shall be reimbursed for their
necessary traveling and other expenses while attending the meetings of the council,
except a member who resides outside the Commonwealth shall not be reimbursed for out-
of-state travel. Each institution shall pay the expenses of its own representatives. The
expenses of the chief state school officer shall be paid by the state in the same manner as
his or her other traveling expenses are paid.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 3:46 PM Jacketed